tr: Tekerlek profili: Mermi; Konik; Eliptik; Düz; Yarış; Yuvarlak; Konik mermi; Diğer
nb: Hjulprofil: Kule; Konisk; Elliptisk; Flat; Race; Rund; Avsmalnende kule; Annet
sl-SI: Profil kolesa: Konica; Stožčasto; Eliptično; Raven; Dirkalno; Okroglo; Zožena konica; Drugo
th: รูปทรงล้อ: ทรงกระสุน; ทรงกรวย; ทรงรี; แบน; สำหรับแข่งขัน; กลม; ทรงกระสุนปลายสอบ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Профил на колелото: Куршум; Коничен; Елипсовиден; Плосък; Състезателен; Кръгъл; Заострен куршум; Друго
el: Προφίλ τροχού: Βολίδα; Κωνικό; Ελλειπτικό; Επίπεδο; Αγωνιστικό; Στρογγυλό; Κωνική βολίδα; Άλλο
cs: Profil kola: Střela; Kónický; Eliptický; Plochý; Závodní; Kulatý; Zúžená střela; Jiný
ko: 휠 프로파일: 총알형; 원뿔형; 타원형; 플랫; 레이스; 라운드; 테이퍼드 총알형; 기타
ro-RO: Profil al roții: Glonț; Conic; Eliptic; Plat; Curse; Rotund; Glonț conic; Altele
hr-HR: Profil kotača: Metak; Konusni; Eliptični; Ravni; Trkaći; Okrugli; Suženi metak; Ostalo
nl: Wielprofiel: Bullet; Conisch; Elliptisch; Plat; Race; Rond; Taps toelopende bullet; Overig
da: Hjulprofil: Bullet; Konisk; Elliptisk; Flad; Race; Rund; Tilspidset bullet; Andet
sk-SK: Profil kolesa: Bullet; Kónický; Eliptický; Plochý; Pretekársky; Okrúhly; Zúžený bullet; Iné
ja: ホイールプロファイル: バレット; コニカル; エリプティカル; フラット; レース; ラウンド; テーパードバレット; その他
sv: Hjulprofil: Kula; Konisk; Elliptisk; Platt; Tävling; Rund; Avsmalnande kula; Övrigt
vi: Biên dạng bánh xe: Hình viên đạn; Hình nón; Hình elip; Phẳng; Đua; Tròn; Hình viên đạn thuôn; Khác
pl: Profil koła: Bullet; Conical; Eliptyczny; Płaski; Race; Okrągły; Tapered Bullet; Inny
es: Perfil de rueda: Bala; Cónico; Elíptico; Plano; Carrera; Redondo; Bala ahusada; Otro
pt-PT: Perfil da roda: Bala; Cónico; Elíptico; Plano; Corrida; Redondo; Bala afunilada; Outro
ru: Профиль колеса: Пулевидный; Конический; Эллиптический; Плоский; Гоночный; Круглый; Узкий пулевидный; Другое
de: Rollenprofil: Bullet; Konisch; Elliptisch; Flach; Race; Rund; Tapered Bullet; Andere
hu: Kerékprofil: Lövedék; Kúpos; Elliptikus; Lapos; Verseny; Kerek; Kúpos lövedék; Egyéb
fr: Profil de roue: Balle; Conique; Elliptique; Plat; Course; Rond; Balle profilée; Autre
zh-TW: 車輪輪廓: 子彈型; 圓錐形; 橢圓形; 平坦型; 競速型; 圓形; 錐面子彈型; 其他
pt-BR: Perfil da roda: Bala; Cônico; Elíptico; Plano; Corrida; Redondo; Bala cônica; Outro
zh-CN: 滑轮轮廓: 子弹头; 锥形; 椭圆形; 平面; 竞速型; 圆形; 锥形子弹头; 其他
it: Profilo della ruota: A proiettile; Conico; Ellittico; Piatto; Da gara; Rotondo; A proiettile affusolato; Altro
fi: Pyörän profiili: Luoti; Kartio; Elliptinen; Tasainen; Kilpa; Pyöreä; Kapeneva luoti; Muu
en: Wheel profile: Bullet; Conical; Elliptical; Flat; Race; Round; Tapered Bullet; Other
lt-LT: Rato profilis: Kulkos; Kūginis; Elipsinis; Plokščias; Lenktynių; Apvalus; Siaurėjanti kulka; Kita